Hawaii statutes.
§281-32.5 Permits for trade shows or other
exhibitions. Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, any
trade exhibitor, trade organization or other exhibitor shall apply to the
liquor commission or agency administrator for the issuance of a permit, without
hearings, fees, notarizing of documents, submission of floor plans, and other
requirements, to receive liquor from within or outside the State for display
and sampling on a not-for-sale basis at trade exhibitions, shows or other
exhibitions, subject to such terms and conditions as may be set by the
commission. [L 1979, c 37, §1; am L 1990, c 171, §11; am L 1991, c 236, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next